th: แพลตฟอร์มวิดีโอเกม: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; มือถือ; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; ไอน้ำ; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); ความจริงเสมือน; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; อื่นๆ
sv: Videospelplattform: Amiga; Arkad; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobil; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Ånga; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtuell verklighet; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Annat
da: Computerspilplatform: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobil; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; Pc; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Damp; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtual Reality; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Andet
es: Plataforma de videojuegos: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Móvil; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; Playstation 1; Playstation 2; Playstation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation portátil (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Vapor; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Realidad virtual; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Otros
vi: Nền tảng trò chơi điện tử: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Di động; Neo geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Hệ thống giải trí Nintendo (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; Máy tính cá nhân; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation di động (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Hơi nước; Hệ thống giải trí Super Nintendo (SNES); Thực tế ảo; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Khác
nl: Videogameplatform: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobiel; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; Pc; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Stoom; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtual reality; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Andere
pt-PT: Plataforma de videojogo: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Móvel; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Vapor; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Realidade virtual; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Série XS; Outro
en: Video game platform: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobile; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Steam; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtual Reality; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Other
sk-SK: Platforma videohier: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobil; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Naparovanie; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtuálna realita; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Iné
hr-HR: Platforma za videoigre: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobilni; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Para; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtual Reality; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Ostalo
hu: Videojáték platformja: Amiga; Árkád; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobil; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Steam; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtuális valóság; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Egyéb
de: Videospielplattform: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobil; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Dampf; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtuelle Realität; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Platformă de jocuri video: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobile; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Abur; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Realitate virtuală; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Altele
it: Piattaforma di videogiochi: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodoro 64; Game Boy; Mobile; NeoGeo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Sistema di intrattenimento Nintendo (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portatile (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; A vapore; Sistema di intrattenimento Super Nintendo (SNES); Realtà virtuale; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Altro
fr: Plateforme du jeu vidéo: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobile; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Vapeur; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Réalité virtuelle; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Autre
tr: Video oyun platformu: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobil; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega genesis; Sega Saturn; Buhar; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Sanal Gerçeklik; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Diğer
ja: ビデオゲームプラットフォーム: Amiga; アーケード; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; コモドール64; ゲームボーイ; モバイル; ネオジオ; ニンテンドー2DS; ニンテンドー3DS; NINTENDO64; ニンテンドーDS; ニンテンドーエンターテインメントシステム (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; ニンテンドーWii; ニンテンドーWii U; PC; プレイステーション1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; プレイステーション・ポータブル (PSP); プレイステーション・ヴィータ; セガ ドリームキャスト; セガジェネシス; セガサターン; スチーム; スーパーニンテンドーエンターテインメントシステム (SNES); バーチャルリアリティ; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; XboxシリーズXS; その他
pl: Platforma gier wideo: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Ruchome; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; Playstation 1; Playstation 2; Playstation 3; Playstation 4; Playstation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Para; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Wirtualna rzeczywistość; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox z serii XS; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Platforma za video igre: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Telefon; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Para; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtualna resničnost; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Drugo
nb: Videospillplattform: Amiga; Arkade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobil; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega genesis; Sega Saturn; Damp; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtuell virkelighet; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Annen
cs: Platforma videohry: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobilní; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Pára; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtuální realita; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series X; Jiné
lt-LT: Vaizdo žaidimų platforma: „Amiga“; „Arkada“; „Atari 2600“; „Atari 7800“; „Commodore 64“; „Game Boy“; Mobilus; „Neo Geo“; „Nintendo 2DS“; „Nintendo 3DS“; „Nintendo 64“; „Nintendo DS“; „Nintendo Entertainment System“ (NES); „Nintendo GameCube“; „Nintendo Switch“; „Nintendo Wii“; „Nintendo Wii U“; PC; „PlayStation 1“; „PlayStation 2“; „PlayStation 3“; „PlayStation 4“; „PlayStation 5“; „PlayStation Portable“ (PSP); „PlayStation Vita“; „Sega Dreamcast“; „Sega Genesis“; „Sega Saturn“; Gaminimas garuose; „Super Nintendo Entertainment System“ (NES); Virtuali realybė; „Xbox“; „Xbox 360“; „Xbox One“; „Xbox Series XS“; Kita
zh-TW: 電子遊戲平台: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; 康懋達 64; 遊戲小子; 行動; Neo Geo; 任天堂 2DS; 任天堂 3DS; 任天堂 64; 任天堂 DS; 任天堂娛樂系統 (NES); Nintendo GameCube; 任天堂 switch; 任天堂 Wii; 任天堂 Wii U; PC; Playstation 1; Playstation 2; Playstation 3; Playstation 4; Playstation 5; 便攜式遊戲機 (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega 土星; 蒸氣; 超級任天堂娛樂系統 (SNES); 虛擬實境; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; 其他
bg-BG: Платформа за видео игри: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Мобилна; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Steam; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Виртуална реалност; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Други
ko: 비디오 게임 플랫폼: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; 모바일; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; 닌텐도 스위치; 닌텐도 Wii; 닌텐도 Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; 스팀; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); 가상 현실; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; 기타
el: Πλατφόρμα βιντεοπαιχνιδιών: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Κινητό; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Μαγείρεμα στον ατμό; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Virtual Reality; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Άλλο
fi: Videopelialusta: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Mobiili; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo-viihdejärjestelmä (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; Kannettava PlayStation (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturnus; Höyry; Super Nintendo -viihdejärjestelmä (SNES); Virtuaalitodellisuus; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Muu
ru: Платформа видеоигры: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Мобильные; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Steam; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Виртуальная реальность; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Другой
zh-CN: 视频游戏平台: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; 移动设备; Neo Geo; 任天堂 2DS; 任天堂 3DS; 任天堂 64; 任天堂 DS; 任天堂娱乐系统 (NES); 任天堂游戏盒子; 任天堂 Switch; 任天堂 Wii; 任天堂 Wii U; 电脑; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; 蒸汽; 超级任天堂娱乐系统 (SNES); 虚拟现实; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series S; 其他
pt-BR: Plataforma de videogame: Amiga; Arcade; Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Commodore 64; Game Boy; Móvel; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PC; Playstation 1; PlayStation 2; Playstation 3; Playstation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Vapor; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Realidade virtual; Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Outro